District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.106

Short title and summary.

The District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics shall be empowered to propose a short title and summary of the initiative and referendum matter which accurately reflects the intent and meaning of the proposed referendum or initiative. Any citizen may petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia no later than 30 days prior to the election at which the initiative or referendum will be held for a writ in the nature of mandamus to correct any inaccurate short title and summary by the District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics and to mandate that Board to properly state the summary of the initiative or referendum measure.

Mar. 10, 1978, D.C. Law 2-46, § 2, 24 DCR 199
Oct. 27, 1978, 92 Stat. 2023, Pub. L. 95-526
1973 Ed., § 1-186.
1981 Ed., § 1-286.